Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 4
CONGRESSIONAL VACANCY ELECTIONS

1-4-401. Time of congressional vacancy elections.

Except as provided in section 1-4-401.5, when any vacancy occurs in the office of representative in congress from this state, the governor shall set a day to hold an election to fill the vacancy and cause notice of the election to be given as required in part 2 of article 5 of this title; but no congressional vacancy election shall be held during the ninety days prior to a general election or less than eighty-five days or more than one hundred days after the vacancy occurs.

A congressional vacancy election shall be conducted and the results thereof surveyed and certified in all respects as nearly as practicable in like manner as for general elections, except as otherwise provided in this code.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 324, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 350, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 676, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1765, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 829, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 409, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1063, § 5, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-11-101 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For registration for congressional vacancy elections, see § 1-2-210; for the power of the county central committee to fill vacancies, see § 1-3-104; for filling vacancies to serve as judges of elections, see § 1-6-113.

1-4-401.5. Special congressional vacancy election - continuity in representation - rules.

In the event of a declaration by the speaker of the United States house of representatives pursuant to 2 U.S.C. sec. 8 (b) that vacancies exist in more than one hundred of the offices of representatives in congress and where one or more of those vacancies is in the office of representative in congress from this state, the governor shall issue a proclamation setting a day to hold a special congressional vacancy election. The special congressional vacancy election shall be conducted on a Tuesday not more than forty-nine days after the date of the declaration, unless a general election for the office is to be held within seventy-five days of the date of the declaration.

Candidates at the special congressional vacancy election shall be nominated by the party congressional central committee selected pursuant to section 1-3-103 (3) not later than ten days after the declaration by the speaker of the United States house of representatives described in subsection (1) of this section.

A person who desires to be an unaffiliated candidate at the special congressional vacancy election shall submit to the secretary of state a notarized candidate's statement of intent together with a nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars.

The secretary of state shall have the authority to promulgate rules as may be necessary to administer and enforce any provision of this section or to adjust statutory deadlines to ensure that a special congressional vacancy election is held within the time required by this section and 2 U.S.C. sec. 8 (b).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 409, § 3, effective August 5.

1-4-402. Nominations of political party candidates.

Any convention of delegates of a political party or any committee authorized by resolution of the convention shall nominate a candidate to fill a vacancy in the unexpired term of a representative in congress. A state central committee, its managing or executive committee selected pursuant to section 1-3-105 (2), or any other committee designated by the bylaws of the state central committee to convene a convention to nominate a candidate to fill a vacancy in the unexpired term of a representative in congress shall convene the convention and shall provide the procedure for the nomination of the candidate. A copy of the notice of election, as set by the governor and filed with the secretary of state, shall be sent by certified mail to the state chairperson of each political party.

Upon receipt of the notice, the state chairperson shall issue a call for the state convention, stating the number of delegates from each county and the method of their selection.

No convention shall be held later than the twentieth day from the date of the order issued by the governor.

Any candidate nominated by a political party must be affiliated with the party for at least twelve consecutive months prior to the date the convention begins, as shown in the statewide voter registration system.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d), if a political party has established a rule regarding the length of affiliation which is necessary to be eligible for nomination by convention for the office of representative in congress, the party rule shall apply.

The nomination to fill the vacancy in the unexpired term of a representative in congress made by the political party convention or a committee authorized by the convention shall be certified by affidavit of the presiding officer and secretary of the convention or committee.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 325, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 362, § 1, effective January 14; (1) amended, p. 351, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(d) amended, p. 293, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 676, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

(1)(d)(II) amended, p. 160, § 8, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

(1)(d)(I) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 575, § 27, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-107 as it existed prior to 1980.

Cross references:

For methods of nomination, see §§ 1-4-502 and 1-4-503; for protests of designations and nominations, see § 1-4-909.

1-4-403. Nomination of unaffiliated candidates for congressional vacancy election.

Except as provided in section 1-4-401.5, candidates for congress at a congressional vacancy election who do not wish to affiliate with a major political party may be nominated pursuant to the provisions of section 1-4-802.

Petitions must be filed by 3 p.m. on the twentieth day after the date of the order issued by the governor.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire article R&RE, p. 325, § 1, effective January 1, 1981.

L. 83:

Entire section R&RE, p. 351, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 677, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 762, § 19, effective May 20.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 410, § 4, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(2) amended, (SB 11-189), ch. 243, p. 1063, § 6, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-14-107 (5) as it existed prior to 1980.

1-4-404. Nomination and acceptance of candidate.

Any person nominated in accordance with this article 4 shall file a written acceptance with the secretary of state by mail or hand delivery. The written acceptance must be postmarked or received by the secretary of state within four business days after the adjournment of the assembly. If an acceptance is not filed within the specified time, the candidate is deemed to have declined the nomination, and the nomination must be treated as a vacancy to be filled as provided in part 10 of this article 4.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 351, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire part amended, p. 677, § 4, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 829, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 832, § 9, effective May 5.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 962, § 6, effective August 9.